District of Columbia statutes.
2-303.22

Repealed

Energy performance-based contract procedures; required contract provisions.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 322
as added Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-284, § 2(b), 50 DCR 935
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of District of Columbia Government Purchase Card Program Reporting Requirements Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-40, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3040).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of District of Columbia Government Purchase Card Program Reporting Requirements Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-562, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10530).
For temporary (90 day) addition of a provision suspending the purchase authority under the District of Columbia Government Purchase Card Program, see § 2 of Suspension of Purchase Authority in the District of Columbia Government Purchase Card Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-144, July 30, 2001, 50 DCR 6893).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Suspension of Purchase Authority in the District of Columbia Government Purchase Card Program Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-61, December 9, 2003, law notification 51 DCR 1796).